Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-66] Circumvention of, or
tampering with, an ignition interlock device by a person who has been
restricted to operating a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
penalties. (a) No person whose driving privileges have been restricted to
operating a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device shall knowingly:

(1) Request, solicit, direct, or authorize another
person to blow into an ignition interlock device or start a vehicle equipped
with the device for the purpose of providing an operable vehicle to a person
who has been restricted by law to operating only a vehicle so equipped; or

(2) Tamper with an ignition interlock device with the
intent to render it inaccurate or inoperable.

(b) Any person required under subsection (a) to
drive using an ignition interlock device, who violates subsection (a) shall be
sentenced without possibility of probation or suspension of sentence as
follows:

(1) For a first offense, or any offense not preceded
within a five-year period by conviction under this section or section
291E-62(a)(3):

(A) A term of imprisonment of not less than
three consecutive days but not more than thirty days;

(B) A fine of not less than $250 but not more
than $1,000; and

(C) Loss of the privilege to operate a vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device;

(2) For an offense that occurs within five years of a
prior conviction for an offense under this section or section 291E-62(a)(3):

(A) Thirty days imprisonment;

(B) A $1,000 fine; and

(C) Loss of the privilege to operate a vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device; and

(3) For an offense that occurs within five years of
two or more prior convictions for offenses under this section or section
291E-62(a)(3), or any combination thereof:

(A) One year imprisonment;

(B) A $2,000 fine; and

(C) Loss of the privilege to operate a vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device. [L 2010, c 166, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next